Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14A-116] Wilful misrepresentation and
fraud. (a) Any person who wilfully makes a false statement or
representation for the purpose of directly obtaining any compensation or
payment or for the purpose of avoiding any compensation or payment under this
article shall be subject to the penalties in section 386-98.

(b) The company shall develop and implement a
program to identify and investigate fraudulent insurance acts. [L 1996, c 261,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next